South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3203.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 104, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-104-27. (A) A Palmetto Fellows Scholarship may be renewed annually, based on the date of initial college enrollment, for no more than a total of: (1) two terms toward a one-year certificate or diploma program; (2) four terms toward the first associate degree or two-year diploma program; (3) eight terms toward the first bachelor's degree or a program of study that is structured so as not to require a bachelor's degree and leads to a graduate degree; (4) ten terms toward the first approved five-year bachelor's degree; or (5) ten terms toward the first bachelor's degree and a master's degree offered together in an accelerated format, whether at one institution or cooperatively through two institutions. (B) The Palmetto Fellows Scholarship Enhancement may be awarded, based on the date of initial college enrollment, for no more than a total of: (1) six terms toward the first bachelor's degree or a program of study that is structured so as not to require a bachelor's degree and leads to a graduate degree; (2) eight terms toward the first approved five-year bachelor's degree; or (3) eight terms toward the first bachelor's degree and a master's degree offered together in an accelerated format, whether at one institution or cooperatively through two institutions. SECTION 2.  Section 59-149-60 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-149-60. The student may receive a LIFE Scholarship for not more than ten semesters for a five-year degree program, eight semesters for a four-year degree program, four semesters for a two-year degree program, or six semesters for a three-year degree program. For purposes of this chapter, a five-year degree program includes an accelerated program designed for a student to progress through both a bachelor's degree and master's degree without stopping one degree program to start the other or meeting otherwise required criteria, such as completion of an undergraduate degree and submission of standardized testing scores. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----